Idaho, session 2025, H0343.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 21-806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
21-806. ELECTION OF BOARD OF TRUSTEES. (1) At the next succeeding pri-
mary election following the creation of any such regional airport author-
ity, the electors of each of the legislative districts within the partici-
pating counties within such region shall elect, on a nonpartisan basis, a
member of the authority's permanent board of trustees, hereinafter referred
to as the board, except that in the northern and north central regions, one
(1) additional board member shall be elected from each such region at large.
At the first such election, members elected from even-numbered legislative
districts, together with the member elected at large from the northern re-
gion and the member elected at large from the north central region, shall be
elected for four (4) year terms of office, and members elected from odd-num-
bered legislative districts shall be elected for two (2) year terms of of-
fice. Thereafter all such members shall be elected for four (4) year terms
of office, and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.
The term of office of members so elected shall commence on December 1 of the
year in which they were elected.
(2) Notice of the election and the conduct thereof shall be as pre-
scribed in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. As a condition of voting, an
elector shall meet the qualifications prescribed in section 34-402, Idaho
Code, and in addition shall be a resident of the regional airport authority.
(3) In any election for member of the board, if after the deadline for
filing a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that only
one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated for that office, it shall not
be necessary for the candidate to stand for election and the board shall de-
clare such candidate elected as a member of the board and the secretary of the
district shall immediately make and deliver to such person a certificate of
election.
(4) The person receiving the largest number of votes shall be declared
elected. If it be necessary to resolve a tie between two (2) or more persons,
the interim board or the permanent board, as the case may be, shall determine
by lot which thereof shall be declared elected. The clerk of the board shall
promptly notify any person by mail of his election, enclosing a form of oath
to be subscribed by him as herein provided.
(5) Elections held pursuant to this section shall coincide with other
elections held by the state of Idaho or any subdivision thereof, or any mu-
nicipality or school district, subject to the provisions of sections 34-106
and 34-1401, Idaho Code.
(6) Elections of board members shall, after the first such election, be
held every other year in even-numbered years, and shall be held on such uni-
form day consistent with the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, as the
board shall determine. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment
of remaining members, for the expiration of such term of office. The board
members shall take and subscribe the oath of office required in the case of


state officers and said oath shall be filed with the secretary of state. Mem-
bers shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their official duties pursuant to the provisions of section
59-509(b), Idaho Code. Members shall not be provided with retirement bene-
fits or health care benefits.
SECTION 2. That Section 22-208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-208. EXPENSES OF BOARD MEMBERS. The members of the county fair
board shall not be paid but shall be reimbursed pursuant to the provisions of
section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, for their actual and necessary expenses out
of the funds provided for fair purposes, upon approval of claims for the same
by the board of county commissioners. Members shall not be provided with
retirement benefits or health care benefits.
SECTION 3. That Section 22-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-306. COMPENSATION AND MILEAGE OF DIRECTORS. Said directors shall
receive as compensation thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per diem while actu-
ally engaged in the business of the district and the mileage rate established
by the state board of examiners pursuant to the authority in section 67-2008,
Idaho Code, for state officers, agents and employees for each mile actually
and necessarily traveled while transacting such business. Directors shall
not be paid but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses pur-
suant to the provisions of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. Directors shall
not be provided with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
SECTION 4. That Section 22-2410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2410. WEED CONTROL ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (1) Control agencies or
authorities may appoint persons to a weed control advisory committee, who
shall be persons knowledgeable of noxious weeds and the damage done by
such weeds. The members of the advisory committee shall be residents of or
landowners in one (1) of the counties included in the cooperative weed man-
agement area, and shall be appointed for renewable terms of two (2) years.
(2) It shall be the function of each weed control advisory committee to:
(a) Assist in planning and carrying out noxious weed control programs
within or across county, state or federal boundaries as may be provided
by cooperative agreement among the participating parties for control of
noxious weeds in cooperative weed management areas; and
(b) Act as liaison to other weed control advisory committees; and
(c) Provide a forum for public input on matters relating to the control
of noxious weeds.
(3) Members of the advisory committee shall not be paid but may be reim-
bursed for actual and necessary expenses when on committee business pursuant
to the provisions of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. Expense payments may be
made from the noxious weed fund. Members shall not be provided with retire-
ment benefits or health care benefits.


(4) Advisory committees have no executive powers and act in an advisory
capacity only.
SECTION 5. That Section 22-2721, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2721. ELECTION, APPOINTMENT, QUALIFICATIONS AND TENURE OF SUPER-
VISORS. (1) The governing body of the district shall consist of five (5)
supervisors, elected or appointed as provided in this chapter. Elections
shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section and the uni-
form district election law, chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. If at any time
the supervisors of a district deem it necessary, upon majority vote of the
district board, they may increase the number of supervisors to seven (7) or
decrease the number of supervisors to five (5). If increased, the additional
supervisors shall then be appointed as outlined in this section until such
time as regular district elections for two (2) supervisors in each district.
At that time, those districts having seven (7) supervisors shall then elect
four (4) supervisors for four (4) year terms. The two (2) supervisors ap-
pointed by the district shall be persons who are by training and experience
qualified to perform the specialized services that will be required of them
in the performance of their duties. In the event the supervisors of a dis-
trict, upon majority vote of the district board, deem it necessary to reduce
the number of supervisors to five (5), there must either be two (2) vacant
positions on the board or two (2) of the supervisors must first volunteer to
give up their seats. Written notification of the reduction in supervisors,
signed by the district board chairman, shall then be sent to the state soil
and water conservation commission. Such notification shall also be sent
to the secretary of state to ensure only two (2) or three (3) supervisors
shall be on the ballot for the next election cycle. All supervisors shall be
landowners or farmers of the district where they are elected or appointed and
shall be registered to vote in the state of Idaho.
(2) Within thirty (30) days after the date of issuance by the secretary
of state of a certificate of organization of a soil conservation district,
nominating petitions may be filed with the state soil and water conservation
commission to nominate candidates for supervisors of each district. The
county clerk shall conduct the election for the district in compliance with
chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall be the election official for the
district. The election official shall have authority to extend the time
within which nominating petitions may be filed. Nominating petitions shall
be filed with the secretary of the district, and no such nominating petition
shall be accepted by the election official unless it shall be subscribed
by not less than five (5) persons who are qualified electors owning land
or residing within the boundaries of the district. The election official
shall give due notice of an election to be held, subject to the provisions
of section 34-106, Idaho Code, for the election of three (3) supervisors for
the district. The names of all nominees on behalf of whom such nominating
petitions have been filed within the time herein designated shall appear
upon ballots, with directions to choose three (3) names to indicate the
voter's preference. The three (3) candidates who receive the largest num-
ber, respectively, of the votes cast in such election shall be the elected
supervisors for such district.


(3) All elections in districts shall be conducted by the county clerk.
Such election shall be held on the first Tuesday succeeding the first Monday
of November in each even-numbered year. Such elections shall be in compli-
ance with the provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall be
supervised and conducted by the county clerk. The cost of conducting such
elections shall be borne by the county that conducted the election. The
county clerk shall certify to the soil and water conservation district the
names of the elected supervisors. The soil and water conservation district
shall issue certificates of election to each elected supervisor so certi-
fied. The county clerk or county clerks of the county or counties in which
the district is located shall conduct the election for the soil conservation
district, and the county clerk must provide a ballot for the district elec-
tion and must provide a process that allows only qualified electors of the
district to vote in that district's election.
(4) In any election for supervisor, if, after the deadline for filing
a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that the num-
ber of qualified candidates who have been nominated is equal to the number
of supervisors to be elected, it shall not be necessary for the candidates to
stand for election. The board of supervisors shall declare such candidates
elected as supervisors, and the soil and water conservation district shall
immediately make and deliver to such persons certificates of election.
(5) The supervisors shall designate a chairman and may, from time to
time, change such designation. The term of office of each supervisor shall
be four (4) years commencing on the first day of January next following elec-
tion, except that the two (2) supervisors who are first appointed shall be
designated to serve for terms of two (2) years. Vacancies shall be filled for
the unexpired term. The selection of successors to fill an unexpired term
or for a full term shall be made by a vote of the majority of the supervi-
sors duly qualified and acting at the time the vacancy shall arise, and the
supervisors shall certify the name of the appointed supervisor to the state
soil and water conservation commission. In the event supervisors fail to
appoint a replacement within ninety (90) days following a vacancy, and the
vacancy results in the loss of a quorum of the district board, the governor
shall appoint a replacement sufficient to reestablish a quorum of the dis-
trict board. The soil conservation district shall issue a certificate of
such appointment.
(6) A quorum shall consist of three (3) supervisors for those districts
with a total of five (5) supervisors and four (4) supervisors for those dis-
tricts with a total of seven (7) supervisors, and the concurrence of a major-
ity in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determina-
tion. A supervisor shall be entitled to expenses, including travel expense
expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of duties pursuant to the
provisions of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. A supervisor shall receive no
compensation for services from regular district funds, county funds autho-
rized in section 22-2726, Idaho Code, or state funds authorized in section
22-2727, Idaho Code. A supervisor shall not be provided with retirement ben-
efits or health care benefits.
(7) In the event the district has a special project, approved by the
state soil and water conservation commission, making project funds avail-
able from federal or other sources, a supervisor may receive compensation


not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per day plus actual and necessary
expenses from project funds for services directly related to the project.
(8) The supervisors may employ a secretary, technical experts, and such
other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as they may
require and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation.
The supervisors may call upon the attorney general of the state for such le-
gal services as they may require or may employ their own counsel and legal
staff. The supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to one (1) or more
supervisors, or to one (1) or more agents or employees such powers and du-
ties as they may deem proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the state soil
and water conservation commission, upon request, copies of such ordinances,
rules, orders, contracts, forms and other documents as they shall adopt or
employ and such other information concerning the supervisors' activities as
the commission may require in the performance of the commission's duties un-
der this chapter.
(9) The supervisors shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for
all employees and officers entrusted with funds or property; shall provide
for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all
resolutions and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for independent
financial audits in accordance with the provisions of section 67-450B, Idaho
Code. Supervisors shall be subject to recall in accordance with the provi-
sions of chapter 17, title 34, Idaho Code.
(10) The supervisors may invite the legislative body of a municipality
or county located near the territory comprised within the district to desig-
nate a representative to advise and consult with the supervisors of the dis-
trict on all questions of program and policy that may affect the property,
water supply, or other interests of such municipality or county.
SECTION 6. That Section 22-4302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-4302. WEATHER MODIFICATION FUND -- CREATION -- ADMINISTRATION. The
board of trustees of a weather modification district shall conduct the af-
fairs of the district. The board of trustees shall certify a budget to the
board of county commissioners to fund the operations of the district. The
budget preparation, hearings and approval shall be the same as required for
any county budget. The certification of the budget to the board of county
commissioners shall be as required for other taxing districts. The board
of county commissioners may levy annually upon all taxable property in the
weather modification district, a tax not to exceed four (4) mills, to be col-
lected and paid into the county treasury and apportioned to a fund to be des-
ignated the "weather modification" fund, which is hereby created. Such fund
shall be used by the district for the gathering of information upon, aiding
in or conducting programs for weather control or modification, and such ac-
tivities related to weather modification programs as are necessary to insure
the full benefit of such programs. Moneys in the fund may be paid out only
on order of the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall serve without
compensation pursuant to the provisions of section 59-509(a), Idaho Code.
Moneys in the fund shall not be used to provide retirement benefits or health
care benefits for the trustees.


SECTION 7. That Section 25-2604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-2604. CONTROL DISTRICTS. (1) The board of commissioners of any
county in the state may create special control districts in the county for
the control of agricultural pests infesting any such district, may levy an
annual tax, not exceeding two hundredths per cent (.02%) of market value for
assessment purposes of all property within such district, and may appoint
three (3) commissioners to govern the affairs of the pest control district.
Pest control district commissioners shall serve without compensation pur-
suant to the provisions of section 59-509(a), Idaho Code, and shall not be
provided with health care benefits or retirement benefits. The pest control
district, through the authority of the board of commissioners may require
the landowners or their agents in such control district to either control
such agricultural pests on their own lands in such district within a speci-
fied time, or to pay the cost of controlling them if the same are controlled
by agents of the district after failure of the landowner, or his agent, to
perform such duty within the time limited in any notice to such owner, or
agent. Cost of control services performed by employees of a pest control
district shall constitute a lien against the property and any water right
appurtenant thereto at the time of rendition of such service and shall be
collectable as any other taxes. Charges for control services performed by
a control district shall be determined by the board of county commission-
ers but in no case shall charges exceed the actual cost of performing such
service. Such control district may be established in any precinct in the
county.
(2) Before the same shall be established, however, it shall be neces-
sary that a petition be filed with the clerk of the board of commissioners re-
questing the creation of the same, which petition shall be signed by at least
twenty-five (25) qualified electors of each precinct included in the pro-
posed control district.
(3) The commissioners shall order a public hearing on such petition at
a time and place to be fixed in such order, of which hearing notice shall be
given in such manner as the commissioners may order, which time, however,
shall not be less than fourteen (14) days from the giving of the said notice.
After such hearing, said board may by order create such control district not
less than fourteen (14) days after such hearing, fix its boundaries, pro-
vide for a control program in such district and create the necessary machin-
ery to carry out such program unless a petition of protest has been filed with
the clerk of the board of commissioners. Said petition of protest shall meet
the same requirements as to the number of signers and for the same number of
precincts and for the same district boundaries as petitions in favor previ-
ously filed and shall be filed with the clerk of the board of commissioners
not later than fourteen (14) days following said hearing.
(4) In the event that a petition of protest is filed, the board of com-
missioners shall not declare the creation of a control district but shall
call an election, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code,
for the purpose of determining whether or not a control district shall be
created. The cost of conducting the election shall be paid from any county
fund, the use of which for this purpose is not prohibited by statute. The


election shall be conducted in each precinct within the proposed control
district according to the provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code,
and shall require the employment of two (2) election judges and one (1) clerk
for each precinct. A qualified elector is any individual who is qualified to
vote pursuant to the requirements of section 34-104, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 25-2612, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-2612. ANIMAL DAMAGE CONTROL DISTRICTS. (1) There are hereby estab-
lished five (5) animal damage control districts in the state of Idaho.
(a) Animal damage control district number 1 shall consist of the coun-
ties of Benewah, Bonner, Boundary, Clearwater, Idaho, Kootenai, Latah,
Lewis, Nez Perce and Shoshone.
(b) Animal damage control district number 2 shall consist of the coun-
ties of Ada, Adams, Boise, Canyon, Elmore, Gem, Owyhee, Payette, Valley
and Washington.
(c) Animal damage control district number 3 shall consist of the coun-
ties of Blaine, Camas, Cassia, Gooding, Jerome, Lincoln, Minidoka and
Twin Falls.
(d) Animal damage control district number 4 shall consist of the coun-
ties of Bannock, Bear Lake, Bingham, Caribou, Franklin, Oneida and
Power.
(e) Animal damage control district number 5 shall consist of the coun-
ties of Bonneville, Butte, Clark, Custer, Fremont, Jefferson, Lemhi,
Madison and Teton.
(2) A board of directors for each animal damage control district is
hereby created. The board of directors of an animal damage control district
shall consist of one (1) director appointed by the board of county commis-
sioners from each of the participating counties within the district. Nomi-
nation for directors shall be made to the county commissioners by livestock
and agriculturally oriented groups which have a vested and economic interest
in the animal damage control program, and appointees must have a substantial
vested and economic interest in the livestock or other agricultural indus-
try. The length of term shall be two (2) years. A director shall receive such
compensation as may be fixed by order of the district animal damage control
board, and shall be entitled to expense reimbursement in the same manner as
a county employee; compensation and expense. Such reimbursement shall be
pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, and shall be made from the moneys
available to the district animal damage control board. A director shall not
be provided with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(3) The board of directors shall meet at least annually. Such meeting
shall be called at the direction of the chairman of the board or by a major-
ity of the directors in that district. At said annual meeting, the board of
directors shall organize by electing from amongst its members a chairman, a
vice chairman, and such other officers as may be necessary. They shall also
establish operating rules for the board and approve annual work plans for the
animal damage control programs. After the annual meeting, the board of di-
rectors shall meet at such times and places as are required by the board's
rules.


(4) The board of directors shall have authority to receive and disperse
funds from any source for the purpose of controlling predatory animal and
other vertebrate pest damage in the district. Any moneys received by the
board shall be maintained on deposit in a bank or trust company designated as
a state depository, and may be dispersed from such account only over the sig-
nature of at least two (2) members of the board.
(5) All contracts and agreements between the board of directors and
any agency, unit of government, association, organization or private party
shall be reduced to writing, and shall be maintained as a part of the official
records of the board.
SECTION 9. That Section 27-119, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
27-119. COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES OF CEMETERY MAINTENANCE BOARD COM-
MISSIONERS. The Pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code, cemetery mainte-
nance board commissioners may receive compensation of not more than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day spent en-
gaged in meetings of the board that are properly noticed and posted under
the Idaho open meetings law, chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, or on district
business authorized by the board; provided that no commissioner shall re-
ceive per diem payments totaling more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) one
thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) during any fiscal year of the district
for their services as commissioners. Commissioners also shall receive the
amount of their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their official duties pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code. The board
shall fix the compensation, if any, to be paid to the commissioners and other
officers named in this chapter, and of the agents and employees of the board
to be paid out of the treasury of the district. Commissioners shall not be
provided with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
SECTION 10. That Section 31-1421, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-1421. COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS -- EXPENSES -- LIABILITY. (1) Fire
protection district commissioners may receive reasonable compensation for
their services as commissioners. The fire protection board shall fix com-
missioner benefits and compensation for the fiscal year. Compensation for
performing district business shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per
day meeting of the fire protection board that is properly noticed and posted
pursuant to the Idaho open meetings law, chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code. If
a city, county, state or federal declaration of emergency or disaster exists
within the boundaries of the fire protection district, the board may set spe-
cial compensation for commissioners by a resolution that shall be applied to
commissioner compensation only upon a majority vote of the board and shall
continue only for as long as the city, county, state or federal declaration
of emergency or disaster remains in effect within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. District business shall include time spent preparing
for and attending regular and special board meetings and meetings of commit-
tees established by the board. Additional compensation, if approved by a
majority of the fire protection board, may be calculated for commissioners


who attend county or state agency meetings, educational classes, seminars
and other miscellaneous district business. Commissioners may also partic-
ipate in the district's employee benefit package in the same manner as em-
ployees or volunteers. Any proposed commissioner benefits and annual com-
pensation shall be published as a separate line item in the annual budget
of the fire protection district. Compensation and reimbursement for actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties shall
be pursuant to the provisions of section 59-509(q), Idaho Code. Compensa-
tion shall be subject to an annual limit of two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500). Commissioners shall not be provided with retirement benefits or
health care benefits.
(2) Actual expenses of commissioners for travel, and other district ex-
penses approved by the board, shall be paid to the commissioners in addition
to their annual compensation and benefits. The payment for expenses shall be
paid from the funds of the fire protection district on either a per diem basis
or upon the presentation of itemized receipts to the treasurer.
(3) The board shall fix the annual compensation and benefits to be paid
to the other officers, agents and employees of the fire district, which shall
be paid out of the treasury of the fire district.
(4) The district shall be liable and responsible for the actions and
omissions of the commissioners, officers, agents and employees of the dis-
trict, when the commissioners, officers, agents and employees are perform-
ing their duties within the course and scope of their employment with the
district and on behalf of the district.
SECTION 11. That Section 31-3705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-3705. APPOINTMENT AND REMOVAL OF BOARD MEMBERS -- OFFICERS --
MEETINGS. (1) In cases where the city and county are jointly operating such
hospital, and where a hospital or hospitals are being operated by a joint
county-city hospital authority, the members of said hospital board or board
of trustees shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and the
city council in such manner as may be agreed between them, and where either
county or city is alone operating the jointly owned hospital, by the board
of county commissioners of the county or the council of the city which is so
operating the same. All members of the board shall be subject to removal at
any time by the body appointing them, but unless removed shall hold office
until the second Monday in the first month of the hospital's fiscal year
next following the date of their appointment and until their successors are
appointed and qualified; provided, that members of the board of trustees of
a joint county-city hospital authority may be removed only for conviction
of a felony, mental incapacity, failure to attend meetings of the board as
required in the bylaws of the board, or other good and sufficient cause.
(2) The officers of the hospital board shall be a president, secretary
and treasurer and such other officers as the board shall designate, all of
whom shall be elected by such board. The president must be a member of the
board but the secretary and treasurer need not be. It shall be the duty of
the secretary of the board to keep an accurate and complete record of all acts
and proceedings of the board. It shall be the duty of the treasurer to have
custody of all funds coming into the custody of the board and he shall per-


form such other duties as are herein specified, and he shall give bond in such
amount as shall be fixed by the board in the same manner and on the same terms
and conditions as required for the official bonds of county officers. All
officers of the hospital board shall be subject to removal by said board at
any time. The hospital board and any of its officers or members may be paid
reasonable per diem compensation for attending a properly noticed and posted
meeting of the hospital board, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per
day as provided for in section 59-509(q), Idaho Code, as shall be authorized
by the board and/or council authorized to appoint the members of the board.
Compensation shall be subject to an annual limit of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500). Members of the board shall not be provided with retirement
benefits or health care benefits.
(3) Meetings of the hospital board shall be held at such time and place
and under such rules and regulations as the board may establish. A majority
of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and
a majority vote of the members present at any meeting properly called shall
govern as to all questions coming before the meeting.
SECTION 12. That Section 31-3914, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-3914. CORPORATE POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF AMBULANCE SERVICE
COMMISSIONERS. A board of ambulance service commissioners shall have dis-
cretionary powers to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the
district. The discretionary powers shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(1) To sue and be sued;
(2) To purchase, hold, sell, and convey real property, make such con-
tracts, and purchase, hold, sell, and dispose of such personal property as
may be necessary or convenient for the purposes of this chapter;
(3) To levy and apply such taxes for purposes under its exclusive juris-
diction as are authorized by law and to approve the annual district budget by
resolution of the board;
(4) To make and execute all necessary contracts;
(5) To adopt such rules and resolutions as may be necessary to carry out
its duties and responsibilities;
(6) To hire, pay, promote, discipline, and terminate district employ-
ees, contractors, and agents, or to delegate such powers;
(7) To set compensation and benefit levels for employees,
commissioners, contractors, and agents; provided, however, that commis-
sioners shall not be paid but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenses pursuant to the provisions of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, and
commissioners shall not be entitled to health care benefits or retirement
benefits; and
(8) To charge and collect reasonable fees for services provided to res-
idents of the ambulance service district or city, in accordance with the pro-
visions of sections 63-1311 and 63-1311A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 13. That Section 31-4210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


31-4210. COMMISSIONERS -- APPOINTMENT -- QUALIFICATIONS --
TENURE. (1) When a governing body of a county adopts a resolution as afore-
said, it shall appoint five (5) or seven (7) persons as commissioners of the
authority created for said county. Commissioners of the authority shall
serve terms of five (5) years. If the governing body of a county appoints
five (5) persons as commissioners of the authority, the commissioners who
are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two
(2), three (3), four (4), and five (5) years, except that all vacancies shall
be filled for the unexpired term. If the governing body of a county appoints
seven (7) persons as commissioners of the authority, the commissioners
who are first appointed shall be designated to serve terms as follows: one
(1) commissioner for a one (1) year term, two (2) commissioners for two
(2) year terms, two (2) commissioners for three (3) year terms, one (1)
commissioner for a four (4) year term and one (1) commissioner for a five
(5) year term, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired
term. Upon resolution by a governing body of a county, after an authority has
been created with either five (5) or seven (7) commissioners, the number of
commissioners may be increased from five (5) to seven (7) or reduced from
seven (7) to five (5). No commissioner of any authority may be an officer or
employee of the county for which the authority is created. A commissioner
shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified. A
certificate of appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be
filed with the clerk and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the
due and proper appointment of such commissioner. The service of a housing
assistance recipient appointed as a commissioner pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
section 1437(b) shall be contingent upon his continued receipt of housing
assistance. A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services
for the authority in any capacity, but he shall be entitled to the necessary
expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties
pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. A commissioner shall not be
provided with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(2) The powers of each authority shall be vested in the commissioners.
A majority of the appointed commissioners shall constitute a quorum of the
authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its pow-
ers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon
a vote of a majority of the commissioners present. The bylaws of the au-
thority shall designate which of the commissioners appointed shall be the
first chairman and such chairman shall serve in the capacity of chairman un-
til the expiration of his term of office as commissioner. When the office of
the chairman of the authority thereafter becomes vacant, the commissioners
shall select a chairman from their number, a vice chairman, and may employ
a secretary, an executive director who shall serve as an at-will employee
of the commissioners, technical experts and such other officers, agents and
employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine
their qualifications, duties and compensation. For such legal services as
it may require, an authority may call upon the prosecuting attorney of the
county or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may dele-
gate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it
may deem proper.


SECTION 14. That Section 31-4305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4305. DIRECTORS -- QUALIFICATIONS -- VACANCY -- COMPENSATION --
TERM. (1) Each district shall be governed by a board of three (3) directors
who shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of such district and
all powers granted to such district by this chapter shall be exercised by
such board or its duly authorized officers and agents.
(2) At any time after the creation of the district, the board of direc-
tors may, by resolution duly adopted, increase the size of the board from
three (3) members to five (5) members. The resolution shall provide for the
designation of five (5) director's subdistricts. A qualified elector shall
be appointed by the board to each of the newly created director's positions,
one (1) of whom shall serve until the first district election thereafter
held, and one (1) of whom shall serve until the second district election
thereafter held.
(3) Every director appointed or elected shall be a qualified elector
and a resident of such district. Not more than one (1) director shall reside
in the same director's subdistrict. Each director shall take and subscribe
an oath of office before assuming any duties, which oath shall be filed in the
records of the board. Any vacancy occurring in the office of director, other
than by expiration of the term of office, shall be filled by appointment by
the board for the unexpired term. The directors shall receive no compensa-
tion for their services as a director but shall be entitled to reimbursement
for the amount of their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the per-
formance of their official duties pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.
The directors shall not be provided with retirement benefits or health care
benefits. Following the term of the initial appointment, a director shall be
elected for a term of four (4) years which shall begin on the first day of Jan-
uary of the year following such election and shall continue until a successor
is elected and has qualified.
SECTION 15. That Section 31-4707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4707. EXPENSES OF BOARD MEMBERS. The members of the county museum
board shall be paid their actual and necessary expenses out of the funds pro-
vided for museum purposes pursuant to the provisions of section 59-509(b),
Idaho Code, upon approval of claims for the same by the board of county com-
missioners. Board members shall not be provided with retirement benefits or
health care benefits.
SECTION 16. That Section 31-4904, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4904. DISTRICT BOARD -- QUORUM -- MEETINGS. A district shall be
governed by a board of directors consisting of not less than three (3) mem-
bers, hereinafter referred to as the district board, which shall be vested
with the authority, control and supervision of the district. The district
board shall consist of one (1) commissioner from each participating county,
appointed by the commissioners of the participating county. If the district


includes only two (2) counties, the commissioners of the two (2) partici-
pating counties shall jointly appoint a third member of the district board.
Ex officio, nonvoting members may be appointed by the district board. The
district board shall designate one (1) of its members as president, shall
appoint a treasurer, who need not be a member of the district board, and
shall establish such other officers as it deems necessary. The district
board shall adopt bylaws for its own operation and establish such regular
meeting dates and times as it shall deem necessary. A majority of the voting
members of the district board shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of
the quorum present shall be sufficient to take any action. A member of the
district board shall serve for a two (2) year term and may be reappointed by
the commissioners appointing such member. Any member may be removed by the
commissioners who originally appointed such member, at any time and for any
reason. Any vacancy shall be filled by the original appointing commission-
ers. Members of a district board shall serve without compensation, but may
be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in attending board meetings
or conducting other district business under such rules as the district board
may adopt consistent with the provisions of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.
Members shall not be provided with retirement benefits or health care bene-
fits. Regular and special meetings of a district board shall be conducted in
compliance with chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.
SECTION 17. That Section 33-2119, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2119. APPOINTMENT, QUALIFICATIONS AND TENURE OF COMMISSION-
ERS. (1) When the board of trustees of a junior college district adopts a
resolution as set forth in the preceding section, the clerk of said board
shall promptly transmit a certified copy of said resolution to the governor
of the state of Idaho, and the governor shall promptly thereafter appoint
three (3) persons as commissioners of the commission created for said dis-
trict. The governor shall certify to the clerk of the district the names of
the persons so appointed, and the clerk shall notify said persons in writing
of their appointment and the term for which each of them is appointed. The
commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms
of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years respectively, from the date of their
appointment, but thereafter commissioners shall be appointed as aforesaid
for a term of office of 3 years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for
the unexpired term. No commissioner may be an officer of or employee of the
junior college district for which the commission is created. A commissioner
shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified.
A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall
be filed with the clerk, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of
the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. A commissioner shall
receive no compensation for his services for the authority in any capacity,
but he shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel ex-
penses, incurred in the discharge of his duties pursuant to the provisions
of section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. Commissioners shall not be provided with
retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(2) The powers of each commission shall be vested in the commissioners
thereof in office from time to time. Two (2) commissioners shall consti-


tute a quorum of the authority for the purpose of conducting its business
and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken
by the authority upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present.
The by-laws of the commission shall designate which of the commissioners
appointed shall be the first chairman, and such chairman shall serve in
the capacity of chairman until the expiration of his term of office as com-
missioner. When the office of the chairman thereafter becomes vacant, the
commissioners shall select a chairman from their number. The commissioners
shall select from their number a vice-chairman, and may employ a secretary
(who may be executive director), technical experts and such other officers,
agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall
determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The persons em-
ployed by the commission may be employees of the junior college district but
shall not be trustees of the district. For such legal services as it may
require, the commission may employ its own counsel. The commission may del-
egate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as
it may deem proper.
SECTION 18. That Section 33-2715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2715. BOARD OF TRUSTEES -- SELECTION -- NUMBER -- QUALIFICATIONS --
TERM -- OATH -- APPOINTMENT OF FIRST BOARD. (1) Each library district shall
be governed by a board of trustees of five (5) members elected or appointed as
provided by law, who at the time of their selection and during their terms of
office shall be qualified electors of the district and if trustee zones have
been established under section 33-2718, Idaho Code, shall be a resident of
the trustee zone. Trustees shall be elected at each trustee election, held
on the uniform election date in May. The regular term of a trustee shall be
for four (4) years, or until his successor has been elected and qualified.
Within ten (10) days after his appointment an appointed trustee shall qual-
ify and assume the duties of his office. An elected trustee shall qualify and
assume the duties of his office at the annual meeting. All trustees qualify
by taking the oath of office required of state officers, to be administered
by one (1) of the present trustees or by a trustee retiring.
(2) Following the initial establishment of a library district, the
board of county commissioners of the home county within five (5) days shall
appoint the members of the first board of trustees, who shall serve until the
next election of trustees held in an odd-numbered year or until their succes-
sors are elected and qualified in an odd-numbered year. The initial election
of three (3) trustees shall be for terms of two (2) years, and subsequent reg-
ular terms shall be for four (4) years. The initial and subsequent election
of two (2) trustees shall be for terms of four (4) years. Addition of new
territory to an existing library district shall not be considered an initial
establishment. The first board of trustees shall be sworn by a member of the
board of county commissioners of the home county of the district.
(3) At its first meeting, and after each trustee election, the board
shall organize and elect from its membership a chairman and other officers
necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.
(4) Members of the board shall serve without salary but shall receive
their actual and necessary expenses while engaged in business of the dis-


trict pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho Code. Members shall not be pro-
vided with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(5) For the purpose of achieving an orderly transition from terms of six
(6) years to terms of four (4) years, the following schedule shall be fol-
lowed:
(a) Trustees elected in 2023 or earlier shall serve the remainder of the
regular six (6) year term for which they were most recently elected; and
(b) Trustees elected in 2025 or later shall serve regular terms of four
(4) years.
SECTION 19. That Section 39-2803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2803. SELECTION OF OFFICIALS OF ABATEMENT DISTRICTS. A board of
trustees shall be appointed from those residing within the area of the pro-
posed abatement district to govern the abatement district. The trustees ap-
pointed shall at the first meeting of each year elect a president, secretary,
and treasurer to serve during the ensuing year. The officers of the board
shall be bonded to the extent of five hundred dollars ($500) to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) each as set by the county commissioners. The members of the
board shall be appointed by the county commissioners of the county they are
to represent. When two (2) or more counties or portions thereof comprise an
abatement district, the selection of trustees will be made by mutual agree-
ment of the county commissioners concerned. A board of trustees may have
three (3) or five (5) members, as determined by the county commissioners.
Each trustee shall be a resident property owner and a registered voter.
Trustees shall be appointed for four (4) years on staggered appointments. To
initiate the board, at least one (1) member shall be appointed for two (2)
years, one (1) for three (3) years, and one (1) for four (4) years. Subse-
quent appointments shall be for four (4) years. Trustees shall serve without
compensation but will be reimbursed for necessary expenses involved with the
performance of their official duties pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho
Code. Trustees shall not be provided with retirement benefits or health care
benefits. The county health officer and the county agent shall be ex officio
members of the board. Whenever two (2) or more counties or portions thereof
are included in the district, the health officer and county agent for each
county shall be ex officio members of the board. The directors or heads of
the following state departments or their designated representatives shall
be considered ex officio members of the board and may be called upon for their
advice and assistance in the handling of abatement problems affecting their
direct interests: agriculture, fish and game, lands, transportation, water
resources, and health and welfare.
SECTION 20. That Section 40-2106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-2106. AUTHORITY BOARD. (1) Each authority shall have a governing
board appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the governing bodies of
counties, incorporated cities and highway districts located wholly or par-
tially within the authority.


(2) The board initially shall be composed of not less than five (5)
members selected as follows: two (2) members representing each board of
county commissioners; one (1) member representing highway district com-
missions wholly or partially contained within the region; two (2) members
representing each city with a population of twenty-five thousand (25,000)
or more; and one (1) member representing each city with a population of less
than twenty-five thousand (25,000). Board composition subsequently may be
modified pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Board members shall be appointed by resolution of the appointing
agency and shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing agency. Board mem-
bers may be elected officials of the appointing agency or they may be repre-
sentatives empowered by the agency to act in its best interests. The highway
district board member shall be appointed by the board of commissioners of the
highway district in counties with a single county-wide highway district or,
in counties with more than one (1) highway district, by the board of county
commissioners in consultation with all highway district commissions wholly
or partially contained within the region.
(4) Ex officio members may be appointed to the authority board by any
city or commission or by the board itself and shall serve at the pleasure of
the appointing entity.
(5) Board Pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code, board members may
be compensated forty dollars ($40.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day in
the actual performance of duties, but the total amount to be received as com-
pensation shall not exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) one thou-
sand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per year. Actual expenses shall be paid
in addition to compensation pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code. The
payment for expenses shall be paid from funds of the authority upon presenta-
tion of itemized vouchers, signed by the board member and under oath made to
the secretary of the authority. Board members shall not be provided with re-
tirement benefits or health care benefits.
(6) The authority shall be liable and responsible for the actions of the
board members and employees of the authority when the board members and em-
ployees are performing their duties on behalf of the authority.
(7) Composition of the board may be modified from time to time by the
board, provided that:
(a) The board adopts by majority vote at a regularly scheduled meeting
a statement of intent to revise the board composition and a complete de-
scription of the proposed revision; and
(b) The board submits the statement of intent and proposed revision to
the chief elected official of each city and commission within the au-
thority for review and comment; and
(c) Each city or commission is provided a minimum of sixty (60) days in
which to comment; and
(d) The board adopts a resolution revising the board composition by the
affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of all board members at a regularly
scheduled meeting.
SECTION 21. That Section 42-3114, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


42-3114. COMPENSATION OF COMMISSIONERS. The commissioners of the
district shall fix the compensation they shall each receive for their ser-
vices, not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) per day pursuant
to section 59-509(q), Idaho Code, and shall fix the reimbursement they shall
each receive for their travel and their necessary expenses for each day they
shall be away from their place of residence and engaged in the business of
their office, subject to the limits provided in section 67-2008, Idaho Code.
The commissioners shall present an itemized account under oath on forms
prescribed by the board. The per diem established pursuant to this section
shall be limited to the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per
year. The commissioners shall not be provided with retirement benefits or
health care benefits.
SECTION 22. That Section 42-3209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-3209. ORGANIZATION OF BOARD -- ACCOUNTS OF TREASURER -- COMPENSA-
TION OF MEMBERS -- ANNUAL AUDIT -- REMOVAL OF DIRECTORS. (1) After taking
oath and filing bonds, the board shall choose one (1) of its members as chair-
man of the board and president of the district and shall elect a secretary
and a treasurer of the board and of the district, who may or may not be mem-
bers of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one person. Such
board shall adopt a seal and the secretary shall keep, in a well-bound book,
a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, con-
tracts, bonds given by employees and all corporate acts, which shall be open
to inspection of all owners of real property in the district as well as to all
other interested parties.
(2) The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all money
received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district in permanent
records. He shall file with the clerk of the court, at the expense of the
district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount not less than five thousand
dollars ($5,000), conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of
his office.
(3) Each Pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code, each member of the
board shall receive as compensation for his service a sum not in excess of
one hundred fifty dollars ($150) fifty dollars ($50.00) per meeting, payable
monthly. A meeting shall be properly noticed and posted pursuant to the
Idaho open meetings law, chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, for the compensa-
tion provided for in this subsection to apply. Compensation shall be subject
to a limit of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per year. No member
of the board shall receive any compensation as an employee of the district or
otherwise, other than that herein provided, and no member of the board shall
be interested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his
official representative capacity. No member of the board shall be provided
with retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(4) It shall be the duty of the board of directors to cause an audit to be
made of all financial affairs of the district during each year ending Novem-
ber 30 as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.
(5) The court having jurisdiction of the district shall have the power
to remove directors for cause shown, on petition, notice and hearing.


SECTION 23. That Section 42-3707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-3707. APPOINTMENT, QUALIFICATIONS AND TENURE OF DIRECTORS. (1) The
governing body of the district shall consist of three (3) directors elected
or appointed as provided hereinabove. The director appointed by the commis-
sion shall be an owner of land within the district and shall be a person who
by training and experience is qualified to perform the specialized service
which will be required in the performance of his duties hereunder. The term
of office of each director shall be four (4) years, except that the director
first appointed by the state soil and water conservation commission shall be
designated to serve for a term of two (2) years from the date of his appoint-
ment. A director shall hold office until his successor has been elected or
appointed, and has qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for an unexpired
term by a majority of the directors duly qualified and acting at the time the
vacancy shall arise. A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum
and the concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be
required for its determination. A director shall receive no compensation
for his service, but shall be entitled to expenses, including traveling ex-
penses necessarily incurred in the discharge of his duties pursuant to sec-
tion 59-509(b), Idaho Code. A director shall not be provided with retirement
benefits or health care benefits.
(2) The directors may employ a secretary, technical experts, and such
other employees, permanent and temporary, as they may require, and shall
determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The directors
may employ their own counsel and legal staff. The directors may delegate to
their chairman, to one (1) or more directors, or to agents or employees such
powers and duties as they may deem proper and necessary. The directors shall
furnish to the state soil and water conservation commission, upon request,
copies of such documents or other information concerning the directors'
activities as said commission may require in the performance of its duties
under this chapter. The directors shall provide for the keeping of a record
of all proceedings, resolutions, regulations and orders issued or adopted;
shall provide for an annual audit of its accounts, and shall provide for the
execution of surety bonds by any employee or officer who shall be entrusted
with funds or property of the district.
SECTION 24. That Section 42-5223, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-5223. BOARD OF DIRECTORS -- OFFICERS -- MEETINGS -- COMPENSATION --
VACANCIES. (1) The board of directors annually shall elect a chairman from
their number and shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer to hold office at
the pleasure of the board. Upon appointment the treasurer shall execute and
file with the secretary an official bond in such amount as may be fixed by the
board of directors, and shall thereafter from time to time execute and file
such further bonds as may be required by the board in amounts fixed by it,
which amounts shall be at least fifty percent (50%) of the maximum probable
amount of money in the treasurer's hands at any one (1) time. All such offi-
cial bonds shall be executed by a lawfully qualified surety company.
(2) The board of directors shall designate an office of the district.


(3) The board of directors shall hold a regular monthly meeting in the
district's office on the first Tuesday in every month or such date each month
as it shall fix by resolution, and such special meetings as may be required
for the proper transaction of business. Special meetings may be held on sev-
enty-two (72) hours' notice of the chairman or a majority of the members. A
majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the
concurrence of a majority of the members shall be necessary to constitute
the action of the board. All meetings of the board shall be public and all
records of the board shall be open to the inspection of any member water user,
or representative thereof during business hours.
(4) The Pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho Code, members of the board
of directors shall fix the compensation board members shall receive up to
fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day spent attending the meetings of
the board of directors that are properly noticed and posted under the Idaho
open meetings law, chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, or while engaged in of-
ficial business under the order of the board, subject to an annual maximum
of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200), together with actual and nec-
essary expenses. The term "actual and necessary expenses" shall include all
traveling and lodging expenses necessarily incurred by any director when ab-
sent from his residence in the performance of the duties of his office. Board
members shall not be provided with retirement benefits or health care bene-
fits. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the other officers
of the district.
(5) In case of a vacancy in the office of director occurring otherwise
than by the expiration of a term, the remaining members of the board of direc-
tors shall fill such vacancy by appointing a ground water user who is a member
of the district or a representative thereof, possessing full voting qualifi-
cations under this chapter and the qualifications of the director whose of-
fice has become vacant to serve the remainder of the term.
SECTION 25. That Section 43-319, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-319. COMPENSATION OF DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS. The members of the
board of directors shall fix the compensation board members shall receive up
to one hundred dollars ($100) per day pursuant to section 59-509(q), Idaho
Code, for each day spent attending the properly noticed and posted meetings
of the board, or while engaged in official business under the order of the
board and actual and necessary expenses. The per diem provided for in this
section shall be subject to an annual maximum of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) per year. The term "actual and necessary expenses," shall
be deemed to include all traveling expenses and hotel expenses necessarily
incurred by any director when absent from his residence in the performance of
the duties of his office. Board members shall not be provided with retire-
ment benefits or health care benefits. The board shall fix the compensation
to be paid to the other officers named in this title, to be paid out of the
treasury of the district: provided, that such board shall, upon the petition
of fifty (50) or a majority of the freeholders within such district, submit
to the electors, at any general election, a schedule of salaries and fees
to be paid hereunder. Such petition must be presented to the board twenty
(20) days prior to a general election, and the result of the election shall


be determined and declared in all respects as other elections are determined
and declared under this title.
SECTION 26. That Section 50-2006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2006. URBAN RENEWAL AGENCY.
(1)(a) There is hereby created in each municipality an independent pub-
lic body corporate and politic to be known as the "urban renewal agency"
that was created by resolution as provided in section 50-2005, Idaho
Code, before July 1, 2011, for the municipality; provided, that such
agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder
until or unless the local governing body has made the findings pre-
scribed in section 50-2005, Idaho Code.
(b) An urban renewal agency created after July 1, 2011, shall not trans-
act any business or exercise its powers provided for in this chapter
until a majority of qualified electors, voting in a citywide or coun-
tywide election, depending on the municipality in which such agency is
created, vote to authorize such agency to transact business and exer-
cise its powers provided for in this chapter. If prior to July 1, 2011,
the local governing body has made the findings prescribed in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, then such agency shall transact business and
shall exercise its powers hereunder and is not subject to the require-
ments of this paragraph.
(2) Upon satisfaction of the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact the business and
exercise the powers hereunder by a board of commissioners to be established
as follows:
(a) Unless provided otherwise in this section, the mayor, by and with
the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a
board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, which shall consist
of not less than three (3) commissioners nor more than nine (9) commis-
sioners. In the order of appointment, the mayor shall designate the
number of commissioners to be appointed, and the term of each, provided
that the original term of office of no more than two (2) commissioners
shall expire in the same year. The commissioners shall serve for terms
not to exceed five (5) years, from the date of appointment, except that
all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(b) For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a com-
missioner may be removed by a majority vote of the local governing body
only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the
charges at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing and have had an op-
portunity to be heard in person or by counsel. Any commission position
that becomes vacant at a time other than the expiration of a term shall
be filled by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if
that is the local governing body, by and with the advice and consent of
the local governing body, including the mayor, if applicable, and shall
be filled for the unexpired term.
(c) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may appoint
and designate, from among its members, members of the board of commis-
sioners of the urban renewal agency, provided that such representation


shall be less than a majority of the board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency of the members of the local governing body on and after
July 1, 2017, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges,
and immunities vested by the urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended,
in an appointed board of commissioners, shall be vested in the local
governing body, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-
newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law of
1965, and as amended.
(d) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may termi-
nate the appointed board of commissioners and thereby appoint and des-
ignate itself as the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency
for not more than one (1) calendar year.
(e) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may provide
that the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency shall be
elected at an election held for such purpose on one (1) of the November
dates provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the ordinance may pro-
vide term limits for the commissioners. In this case, all the rights,
powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested by the urban renewal
law of 1965, and as amended, in an appointed board of commissioners,
shall be vested in the elected board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-
newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law
of 1965, and as amended. The provisions of chapter 66, title 67, Idaho
Code, shall apply to elected commissioners, and the county election law
shall apply to the person running for commissioner as if the person were
running for county commissioner. In the event of a vacancy in an elected
commissioner position, the replacement shall be appointed by the mayor
or chair of the board of county commissioners, if that is the local gov-
erning body, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing
body, and shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(3) In all instances, a member of the board of commissioners of the ur-
ban renewal agency must be a resident of the county where the urban renewal
agency is located or is doing business.
(4) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but
shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel expenses, in-
curred in the discharge of his duties pursuant to section 59-509(b), Idaho
Code. Commissioners shall not be provided with retirement benefits or
health care benefits. Each commissioner shall hold office until his succes-
sor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment
or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the
municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due
and proper appointment of such commissioner.
(5)(a) The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the
commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall consti-
tute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the
powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by


the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, un-
less in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number.
(b) The commissioners shall elect the chairman, cochairman, or vice
chairman for a term of one (1) year from among their members. An agency
may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other
agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and
determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For such
legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own
counsel and legal staff.
(c) An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers un-
der this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or be-
fore March 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preced-
ing calendar year, which report shall include the financial data and au-
dit reports required under sections 67-1075 and 67-1076, Idaho Code.
The agency shall be required to hold a public meeting to report these
findings and take comments from the public. At the time of filing the
report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation
in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed
with the municipality and the state controller and that the report is
available for inspection during business hours in the office of the city
clerk or county recorder, in the office of the agency, and at all times
on the website of the state controller.
(d) An urban renewal agency shall have the same fiscal year as a mu-
nicipality and shall be subject to the same audit requirements as a mu-
nicipality. An urban renewal agency shall be required to prepare and
file with its local governing body an annual financial report and shall
prepare, approve, and adopt an annual budget for filing with the local
governing body, for informational purposes. A budget means an annual
estimate of revenues and expenses for the following fiscal year of the
agency.
(6) An urban renewal agency shall comply with the public records law
pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, open meetings law pursuant to
chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, the ethics in government law pursuant to
chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, and the competitive bidding provisions of
chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.
(7) Upon dissolution of the urban renewal agency, title to all property
of the urban renewal agency shall revert to the municipality.
SECTION 27. That Section 67-4909, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4909. ORGANIZATION OF BOARD -- ACCOUNTS OF TREASURER -- COMPENSA-
TION OF MEMBERS -- ANNUAL AUDIT -- REMOVAL OF DIRECTORS. (1) After taking
oath and filing bonds, the board shall choose one (1) of its members as chair-
man of the board and president of the district, and shall elect a secretary
and a treasurer of the board and of the district, who may or may not be members
of the board. The secretary and the treasurer may be one (1) person. Such
board shall adopt a seal and the secretary shall keep, in a well-bound book,
a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, con-
tracts, bonds given by employees and all corporate acts which shall be open
to inspection to all interested parties.


(2) The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate accounts of all money
received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district, in permanent
records. He shall file with the clerk of the court, at the expense of the
district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount not less than five thousand
dollars ($5,000), conditioned on the faithful performance of the duties of
his office.
(3) Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his ser-
vice a sum not in excess of sixty dollars ($60.00) per annum. No member of the
board shall receive any compensation as an employee of the district or other-
wise, other than that herein provided and no member of the board shall be in-
terested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his offi-
cial representative capacity. No member of the board shall be provided with
retirement benefits or health care benefits.
(4) It shall be the duty of the board of directors to cause an audit to be
made of all financial affairs of the district during each year ending Novem-
ber 30th as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.
(5) The court having jurisdiction of the district shall have the power
to remove directors for cause shown, on petition, notice and hearing.
SECTION 28. That Section 70-1404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
70-1404. PER DIEM -- REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES. There shall be paid
to each of the port commissioners from the funds of the district, not more
than fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day spent attending meetings,
or while engaged of the district that are properly noticed and posted or
engaging in port business authorized by the port commission. The per diem
provided for in this section shall be pursuant to section 59-509(n), Idaho
Code, and subject to an annual limit of one thousand two hundred dollars
($1,200). In addition, such commissioners and the agents and employees of
the district shall be entitled to be reimbursed upon order of the commis-
sion, from funds of the district, for all reasonable sums expended by them in
furthering the business of the port subject to the limitations provided for
in section 59-509(n), Idaho Code. Commissioners shall not be provided with
retirement benefits or health care benefits.
SECTION 29. APPLICABILITY. Any official already receiving health care
or retirement benefits from his or her district prior to the effective date
of this act shall continue to receive such benefits, if otherwise eligible,
until the end of the plan year, in the case of health care plans, or fiscal
year, in the case of retirement benefits.
SECTION 30. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.